Utah statutes.
16-10a-1103.   Action on plan.

(1)  After adopting a plan of merger or share exchange, the board of directors of each corporation party to the merger, and the board of directors of each corporation whose shares will be acquired in the share exchange, shall submit the plan of merger to its shareholders for approval, except as provided in:

(a)  Subsection (7);

(b)  Section 16-10a-1104; or

(c)  the plan of share exchange.

(2)  For a plan of merger or share exchange to be approved:

(a)  the board of directors shall recommend the plan of merger or share exchange to the shareholders, unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders with the plan; and

(b)  the shareholders entitled to vote on the plan of merger or share exchange shall approve the plan as provided in Subsection (5).

(3)  The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposed merger or share exchange on any basis.

(4)  The corporation shall give notice of the shareholders' meeting in accordance with Section 16-10a-705 to each shareholder entitled to vote on the plan of merger or share exchange.  The notice shall state that one of the purposes of the meeting is to consider the plan of merger or share exchange and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan.

(5)  Unless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, the initial bylaws, the amended bylaws, or the board of directors acting pursuant to Subsection (3) requires a greater vote, the plan of merger or share exchange to be authorized shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan by that voting group.

(6)  Separate voting by voting groups is required on a plan of:

(a)  merger if the plan contains a provision that, if contained in an amendment to the articles of incorporation, would require action by one or more separate voting groups on the amendment under Section 16-10a-1004; and

(b)  share exchange by each class or series of shares included in the share exchange, with each class or series constituting a separate voting group.

(7)  Action by the shareholders of the surviving corporation on a plan of merger is not required if:

(a)  the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation will not differ, except for amendments enumerated in Section 16-10a-1002, from its articles of incorporation before the merger;

(b)  each shareholder of the surviving corporation whose shares were outstanding immediately before the merger will hold the same number of shares, with identical designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights, immediately after the merger;

(c)  the number of voting shares outstanding immediately after the merger, plus the number of voting shares issuable as a result of the merger either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued pursuant to the merger, will not exceed by more than 20% the total number of voting shares of the surviving corporation outstanding immediately before the merger; and

(d)  the number of participating shares outstanding immediately after the merger, plus the number of participating shares issuable as a result of the merger either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued pursuant to the merger, will not exceed by more than 20% the total number of participating shares outstanding immediately before the merger.

(8)  As used in Subsection (7):

(a)  "Participating shares" means shares that entitle their holders to participate without limitation in distributions.

(b)  "Voting shares" means shares that entitle their holders to vote unconditionally in elections of directors.

(9)  After a plan of merger or share exchange is approved, and at any time before the merger or share exchange becomes effective the merger or share exchange may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, without further shareholder action, in accordance with the procedure set forth in the plan of merger or share exchange or, if none is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

(10)  If a merger or share exchange is abandoned after articles of merger or share exchange have been filed by the division pursuant to Section 16-10a-1105 specifying a delayed effective date, the merger or share exchange may be prevented from becoming effective by delivering to the division for filing prior to the specified effective time and date a statement of abandonment stating that by appropriate corporate action the merger or share exchange has been abandoned.  The statement of abandonment shall be executed in the same manner as the articles of merger or share exchange.

